District of Columbia statutes.
44-106.06

Resident records.

A record shall be maintained for every resident and include the following:

(1)

The resident agreement required by this subchapter, including the “Resident’s Rights” statement and any additional agreements;

(2)

The functional assessment of ADLs;

(3)

A physician’s statement, including medical orders and rehabilitation plans;

(4)

The ISP and any revisions thereto;

(5)

All shared responsibility agreements; and

(6)

Any note and comments added to the record by the ALR.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 606, 47 DCR 2647